Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.73-100 is amended to read as follows:
Any corporation authorized to do business in this state and organized for the purpose of
constructing, maintaining, and operating sewer lines and sewage treatment facilities may,
if it is unable to contract or agree with the owner after a good faith effort to do so,
condemn rights-of-way necessary for constructing, maintaining and operating its
pipelines and, if necessary, pumping stations; and the necessary ingress and egress to
examine, alter, repair and maintain the[such] pipelines. The condemnation proceedings
shall be conducted in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.
Provided, however, that before any corporation shall be authorized to use the provisions
of this section, it shall have presented plans and specifications to the Energy and
Environment Cabinet and received from the[said] cabinet a permit to operate and
maintain the[said] sewage treatment facilities together with an approval of the discharge
of the treated effluent from the[said] facilities to a specific point of the waters of this
Commonwealth. Provided, further, that any person wishing to object to a pipeline or plant
location subject to the provisions of this section shall have the right to have his or her
objections heard by the[said] cabinet pursuant to the provisions of KRS 224.10-440.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 4:30 PM Jacketed